nl: Kruller grootte compatibiliteit: Groot; Mini; Gedeeltelijk; Standaard; Universeel; Andere
da: Øjenvippebukkerens størrelseskompatibilitet: Stor; Mini; Delvist; Standard; Universal; Andet
el: Συμβατότητα μεγέθους ψαλιδιού βλεφαρίδων: Μεγάλη; Μίνι; Τμηματική; Κανονικό; Καθολικής χρήσης; Άλλο
pl: Kompatybilność rozmiaru zalotki: Duży; Min.; Częściowa; Standard; Uniwersalny; Inne
zh-CN: 卷发器尺寸兼容性: 大; 迷你; 部分; 标准; 通用; 其他
es: Compatibilidad de tamaño del rizador: Grande; Mini; Parcial; Estándar; Universal; Otros
ja: カーラーサイズ互換性: 大; ミニ; 一部; スタンダード; ユニバーサル; その他
ru: Совместимость размера щипцов: Большой; Мини; Частичный; Стандартный; Универсальное; Другой
sk-SK: Kompatibilita veľkosti klieštikov na riasy: Veľký; Mini; Čiastočný; Štandardný; Univerzálny; Iné
bg-BG: Съвместимост с размера на машата: Голяма; Мини; Частичен; Стандартно; Универсален; Други
lt-LT: Garbanų formuotuvo dydžio suderinamumas: Didelis; Mini; Dalinis; Standartinis; Universalus; Kita
fr: Compatibilité de taille du recourbe-cils: Grande; Mini; Partiel; Standard; Universel; Autre
hr-HR: Kompatibilnost veličine uvijača: Velika; Mini; Djelomični; Standardni; Univerzalno; Ostalo
tr: Kirpik kıvırıcı boyutu uyumluluğu: Büyük; Mini; Kısmi; Standart; Her mekana uygun; Diğer
sl-SI: Združljivost velikosti kodrnika: Velika; Mini; Delna; Standarden; Univerzalno; Drugo
pt-BR: Compatibilidade de tamanho do curvador: Grande; Mini; Parcial; Padrão; Universal; Outro
fi: Kihartimen kokoyhteensopivuus: Suuri; Mini; Osittainen; Tavallinen; Yleinen; Muu
de: Wimpernzangen-Größenkompatibilität: Groß; Mini; Teilweise; Standard; Universell; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Compatibilidade de tamanho do modelador de pestanas: Grande; Mini; Parcial; Padrão; Universal; Outro
th: ความเข้ากันได้กับขนาดที่ดัดขนตา: ใหญ่; มินิ; บางส่วน; มาตรฐาน; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
cs: Kompatibilita velikosti kulmy: Velká; Mini; Částečný; Standardní; Univerzální; Jiné
nb: Krølletangstørrelseskompatibilitet: Stor; Mini; Delvis; Standard; Universal; Annet
zh-TW: 睫毛夾尺寸相容性: 大; 迷你裙; 部分的; 標準; 通用; 其他
vi: Khả năng tương thích kích thước máy uốn: Lớn; Siêu ngắn; Một phần; Bánh xe tiêu chuẩn; Phổ quát; Khác
ko: 컬러 크기 호환성: 라지; 미니; 부분; 표준; 범용; 기타
en: Curler size compatibility: Large; Mini; Partial; Standard; Universal; Other
hu: Göndörítőméret-kompatibilitás: Nagy; Mini; Részleges; Normál; Általános; Egyéb
ro-RO: Compatibilitatea dimensiunii ondulatoarelor: Mare; Mini; Parțială; Standard; Universal; Altele
it: Compatibilità di dimensioni del piegaciglia: Large; Mini; Parziale; Standard; Universale; Altro
sv: Kompatibilitet med tångstorlek: Stor; Mini; Partiell; Standard; Universell; Övrigt